Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 60. Offenses Against Public Policy.

Secs. 11.60.010 — 11.60.220.
Lotteries; minors; opium dens; gambling; dangerous animals at large; vagrancy.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For present law on gambling offenses, see AS 11.66.200 — 11.66.280; for present law on selling or giving of tobacco to minor, see AS 11.76.100.]

Sec. 11.60.225.
[Renumbered as AS 44.09.015.]

Secs. 11.60.230 — 11.60.240.
Full and equal accommodations, facilities, privileges.
[Repealed, § 8 ch 117 SLA 1965.]

Secs. 11.60.250 — 11.60.270.
[Renumbered as AS 29.43.100 — 29.43.110.]

Secs. 11.60.280 — 11.60.320.
[Renumbered as AS 42.20.300 — 42.20.340.]

Secs. 11.60.340 — 11.60.350.
Conspiracy against rights; deprivation of rights under color of law.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For law on interference with constitutional rights, see AS 11.76.110.]